Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,170
Practice of medicine; laws not applicable.

Any health maintenance organization authorized under the Health Maintenance Organization Act shall not be deemed to be practicing medicine and shall be exempt from the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act relating to the practice of medicine.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 79;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1138.

Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section 38-2001.